Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.630

Liability for damage to land and property—Damages—Costs—Attorneys' fees—Exceptions.

(1) Every person who goes onto the land of another and who removes timber, crops, minerals, or other similar valuable property from the land, or wrongfully causes waste or injury to the land, or wrongfully injures personal property or improvements to real estate on the land, is liable to the injured party for treble the amount of the damages caused by the removal, waste, or injury. For purposes of this section, a person acts "wrongfully" if the person intentionally and unreasonably commits the act or acts while knowing, or having reason to know, that he or she lacks authorization to so act. Damages recoverable under this section include, but are not limited to, damages for the market value of the property removed or injured, and for injury to the land, including the costs of restoration. In addition, the person is liable for reimbursing the injured party for the party's reasonable costs, including but not limited to investigative costs and reasonable attorneys' fees and other litigation-related costs.

(2) This section does not apply in any case where liability for damages is provided under RCW 64.12.030, * 79.01.756, 79.01.760, 79.40.070, or where there is immunity from liability under RCW 64.12.035.

[ 1999 c 248 s 2; 1994 c 280 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 79.01.756, 79.01.760, and 79.40.070 were recodified as RCW 79.02.320, 79.02.300, and 79.02.340, respectively, pursuant to 2003 c 334 s 554. RCW 79.02.340 was subsequently repealed by 2009 c 349 s 5.

Severability—1999 c 248: See note following RCW 64.12.035.